incubator/apertium-snd/apertium-snd.snd.dix
    <pardef n="ڇوڪر/و__n_m" c="I">
      <e><p><l>و</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ي</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ا</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ڪارخان/و__n_f" c="II">
      <e><p><l>و</l><r>و<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ي</l><r>و<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ا</l><r>و<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r>و<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ڪتاب__n_m" c="III">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ٻيڙي__n_f" c="IV"> <!-- BIG BOSS IS WATCHING YOU -->
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="دوست__n_m" c="V">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
<!-- no token found, which'd fall into this paradigm
    <pardef n="__n_f" c="VI">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="__n_m" c="VII">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
-->
    <pardef n="هوا__n_m" c="VIII"> <!-- FIXME: Check gender -->
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ون</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="زال__n_f" c="IX">
      <e><p><l>ءَ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ون</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ڀي/ڻ__n_f" c="XI">
      <e><p><l>ڻ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ڻ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>نر</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>نرن</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="دريا__n_m" c="XII"> <!-- Big boss is watching you -->
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ء</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="سج__n_m" c="XIII">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ون</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e> <!--for eng transliterations-->
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e> <!--for eng transliterations-->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="قلم__n_f" c="XIV">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <!-- Verify the 3 manual ones below, once again sometime  -->
    <pardef n="ڇوڪري__n_f">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ون</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ون</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="هفت/و__n_m">
        <e><p><l>و</l><r>و<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ي</l><r>و<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ا</l><r>و<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ن</l><r>و<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="رات__n_f">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ين</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يون</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Proper nouns -->

    <!-- Proper nouns : Urdu -->
    <pardef n="ویکیپیڈیا__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="org"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="عامل__np">
            <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="مریم__np">
            <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="پاکستان__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="شمال__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="گاندھی__np">
	<e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    

    <pardef n="پاڪستان__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ي</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يءَ</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e> <!--from CIIL grammar -->
      <e><p><l>ءَ</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e> <!--from CIIL grammar -->
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ين</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ڪراچي__np">
	<e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	<e r="LR" c="diac"><p><l>ءَ</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="پريسٽ"><i>پريسٽ</i><par n="دوست__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="پٿر"><i>پٿر</i><par n="دوست__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="استاد"><i>استاد</i><par n="دوست__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="حڪومت"><i>حڪومت</i><par n="دوست__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ڪارخانو"><i>ڪارخان</i><par n="ڪارخان/و__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="پاسو"><i>پاس</i><par n="ڪارخان/و__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="فوج"><i>فوج</i><par n="ٻيڙي__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="جوراب"><i>جوراب</i><par n="ٻيڙي__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="شراب"><i>شراب</i><par n="ٻيڙي__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ڪنڌ"><i>ڪنڌ</i><par n="ٻيڙي__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="اسيمبلي"><i>اسيمبلي</i><par n="زال__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ڇوڪري"><i>ڇوڪري</i><par n="زال__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="مائي"><i>مائي</i><par n="زال__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ٻولي"><i>ٻولي</i><par n="زال__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="صوبو"><i>صوب</i><par n="ڇوڪر/و__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ڪئميراو"><i>ڪئميرا</i><par n="ڇوڪر/و__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="پنو"><i>پن</i><par n="ڇوڪر/و__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ڳنڍڻو"><i>ڳنڍڻو</i><par n="ڇوڪر/و__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="مطالبو"><i>مطالب</i><par n="ڇوڪر/و__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="پکي"><i>پکي</i><par n="ڇوڪري__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ٻوٽو"><i>ٻوٽ</i><par n="ڇوڪري__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="سلسلو"><i>سلسل</i><par n="ڇوڪري__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="هفتو"><i>هفت</i><par n="هفت/و__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="رات"><i>رات</i><par n="رات__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="اکيون"><i>اک</i><par n="رات__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="صاحب"><i>صاحب</i><par n="ڪتاب__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="هوا"><i>هوا</i><par n="هوا__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ڳاله"><i>ڳاله</i><par n="هوا__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="قوم"><i>قوم</i><par n="هوا__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ڳاله"><i>ڳاله</i><par n="هوا__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ڀيڻ"><i>ڀي</i><par n="ڀي/ڻ__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="دريا"><i>دريا</i><par n="دريا__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="درياءَ"><i>درياءَ</i><par n="دريا__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ڇوڪري"><i>ڇوڪري</i><par n="ڇوڪري__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="سياستدان"><i>سياستدان</i><par n="ڪتاب__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="گرج"><i>گرج</i><par n="ڪتاب__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="گردان"><i>گردان</i><par n="ڪتاب__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="طاقت"><i>طاقت</i><par n="سج__n_m"/></e>
	<e lm="سون"><i>سون</i><par n="هفت/و__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ادب"><i>ادب</i><par n="سج__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="هند"><i>هند</i><par n="سج__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="بادشاهه"><i>بادشاهه</i><par n="سج__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="رقم"><i>رقم</i><par n="قلم__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="جڳهه"><i>جڳهه</i><par n="قلم__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="جوڙي"><i>جوڙي</i><par n="قلم__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="سرڪار"><i>سرڪار</i><par n="قلم__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="زینت"><i>زینت</i><par n="عامل__np"/></e>
    <e lm="مرزا"><i>مرزا</i><par n="گاندھی__np"/></e>
    <e lm="الشان"><i>الشان</i><par n="عامل__np"/></e>
    <e lm="گوگل"><i>گوگل</i><par n="ویکیپیڈیا__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ویکیپیڈیا"><i>ویکیپیڈیا</i><par n="ویکیپیڈیا__np"/></e>
    <e lm="عباسی"><i>عباسی</i><par n="عامل__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ہولمز"><i>ہولمز</i><par n="گاندھی__np"/></e>
    <e lm="انصاری"><i>انصاری</i><par n="گاندھی__np"/></e>
    <e lm="گاندھی"><i>گاندھی</i><par n="گاندھی__np"/></e>
    <e lm="حیدر"><i>حیدر</i><par n="عامل__np"/></e>
    <e lm="شمال"><i>شمال</i><par n="شمال__np"/></e>
    <e lm="جنوب"><i>جنوب</i><par n="شمال__np"/></e>
    <e lm="مغرب"><i>مغرب</i><par n="شمال__np"/></e>
    <e lm="مشیل"><i>مشیل</i><par n="مریم__np"/></e>
    <e lm="عائشہ"><i>عائشہ</i><par n="مریم__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ہلیری"><i>ہلیری</i><par n="مریم__np"/></e>
    <e lm="مریم"><i>مریم</i><par n="مریم__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ولندیزا"><i>ولندیزا</i><par n="پاکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ہند"><i>ہند</i><par n="پاکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="بلتستان"><i>بلتستان</i><par n="پاکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="بنگلور"><i>بنگلور</i><par n="پاکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ارجنٽائن"><i>ارجنٽائن</i><par n="پاڪستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="گهانا"><i>گهانا</i><par n="پاڪستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="پاناما"><i>پاناما</i><par n="پاڪستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="اتر ڪوريا"><i>اتر<b/>ڪوريا</i><par n="پاڪستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="روضي ڌڻي"><i>روضي<b/>ڌڻي</i><par n="ڪراچي__np"/></e>
    <e lm="مورو"><i>مورو</i><par n="ڪراچي__np"/></e>
    <e lm="درگاه"><i>درگاه</i><par n="ڪراچي__np"/></e>
    <e lm="ممبئي"><i>ممبئي</i><par n="ڪراچي__np"/></e>
